ko: 구명부표 승인 기준: ISO 12402-4; MED(해양 장비 지침); 지정되지 않음; SOLAS/IMO 승인; Transport Canada 승인; USCG 승인(유형 IV); 기타
de: Zulassungsstandard des Rettungsrings: ISO 12402-4; MED (Marine Equipment Directive); Keine Angabe; SOLAS/IMO-Zulassung; Transport Canada Zulassung; USCG-Zulassung (Typ IV); Sonstige
nb: Standard for godkjenning av livbøye: ISO 12402-4; MED (skipsutstyrsdirektivet); Ikke spesifisert; SOLAS-/IMO-godkjent; Godkjent av Transport Canada; USCG-godkjent (Type IV); Annet
ro-RO: Standard de aprobare a colacului de salvare: ISO 12402-4; MED (Directiva privind echipamentele maritime); Nespecificat; Aprobat de SOLAS/IMO; Aprobat de Transport Canada; Aprobat de USCG (Tipul IV); Altele
lt-LT: Gelbėjimosi rato patvirtinimo standartas: ISO 12402-4; MED (Jūrinės įrangos direktyva); Nenurodyta; Patvirtinta SOLAS / IMO; Patvirtinta „Transport Canada“; Patvirtinta USCG (IV tipas); Kita
hu: Mentőöv jóváhagyási szabványa: ISO 12402-4; MED (Tengerészeti felszerelésekről szóló irányelv); Nincs megadva; SOLAS/IMO által jóváhagyott; Transport Canada által jóváhagyott; USCG által jóváhagyott (IV. típus); Egyéb
bg-BG: Стандарт за одобрение на спасителни пояси: ISO 12402-4; MED (Директива за морско оборудване); Не е посочено; Одобрен от SOLAS/IMO; Одобрен от Transport Canada; Одобрен от USCG (Тип IV); Друг
it: Standard di omologazione del salvagente anulare: ISO 12402-4; MED (Direttiva sull'equipaggiamento marittimo); Non specificato; Approvazione SOLAS/IMO; Approvazione Transport Canada; Approvazione USCG (tipo IV); Altro
ja: 救命浮環の承認基準: ISO 12402-4; MED (舶用機器指令); 指定なし; SOLAS/IMO承認; カナダ運輸省承認; USCG承認 (タイプIV); その他
zh-TW: 救生圈核准標準: ISO 12402-4; 航海設備指令 (MED); 未指定; SOLAS/IMO 核准; 加拿大交通部核准; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 核准 (第 IV 類); 其他
fi: Pelastusrenkaan hyväksyntästandardi: ISO 12402-4; MED (laivavarustedirektiivi); Ei määritetty; SOLAS/IMO-hyväksytty; Transport Canadan hyväksymä; USCG:n hyväksymä (tyyppi IV); Muu
sl-SI: Standard odobritve rešilnega obroča: ISO 12402-4; MED (Direktiva o pomorski opremi); Ni določeno; Odobreno s strani SOLAS/IMO; Odobreno s strani Transport Canada; Odobreno s strani USCG (Type IV); Drugo
es: Estándar de aprobación del salvavidas: ISO 12402-4; MED (Directiva de equipos marinos); No especificado; Aprobado por SOLAS/IMO; Aprobado por Transport Canada; Aprobado por USCG (tipo IV); Otro
hr-HR: Standardno odobrenje za pojas za spašavanje: ISO 12402-4; MED (Direktiva o pomorskoj opremi); Nije navedeno; Odobrio SOLAS/IMO; Odobrio Transport Canada; Odobrio USCG (tip IV); Ostalo
nl: Reddingsboei goedkeuringsnorm: ISO 12402-4; MED (Marine Equipment Directive); Niet gespecificeerd; SOLAS/IMO-goedgekeurd; Transport Canada-goedgekeurd; USCG-goedgekeurd (Type IV); Overige
th: มาตรฐานการอนุมัติห่วงชูชีพ: ISO 12402-4; MED (ระเบียบว่าด้วยอุปกรณ์ทางทะเล); ไม่ระบุ; ผ่านการรับรองมาตรฐาน SOLAS/IMO; ผ่านการรับรองโดย Transport Canada; ผ่านการรับรองโดย USCG (ประเภท IV); อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 救生圈批准标准: ISO 12402-4; MED（海洋设备指令）; 未指定; SOLAS/IMO 批准; 加拿大交通部批准; USCG 批准（IV 型）; 其他
en: Lifebuoy approval standard: ISO 12402-4; MED (Marine Equipment Directive); Not specified; SOLAS/IMO Approved; Transport Canada Approved; USCG Approved (Type IV); Other
da: Godkendelsesstandard for redningskrans: ISO 12402-4; MED (Marine Equipment Directive); Ikke angivet; SOLAS/IMO-godkendt; Godkendt af Transport Canada; USCG-godkendt (type IV); Andet
pl: Koło ratunkowe zatwierdzenie standardu: ISO 12402-4; MED (Dyrektywa w sprawie wyposażenia morskiego); Nie określono; Zatwierdzenie SOLAS/IMO; Zatwierdzenie Transport Canada; Zatwierdzenie USCG (typ IV); Inne
tr: Can simidi onay standardı: ISO 12402-4; MED (Denizcilik Ekipmanları Direktifi); Belirtilmemiş; SOLAS/IMO Onaylı; Transport Canada Onaylı; USCG Onaylı (Tip IV); Diğer
pt-PT: Norma de aprovação da boia salva-vidas: ISO 12402-4; MED (Diretiva dos Equipamentos Marítimos); Não especificado; Aprovado pela SOLAS/IMO; Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela USCG (tipo IV); Outro
ru: Стандарт одобрения спасательного круга: ISO 12402-4; MED (Директива по морскому оборудованию); Не указано; Одобрено SOLAS/IMO; Одобрено Transport Canada; Одобрено USCG (тип IV); Другое
cs: Záchranný kruh schválení standard: ISO 12402-4; MED (Směrnice o námořním zařízení); Nespecifikováno; Schváleno SOLAS/IMO; Schváleno Transport Canada; Schváleno USCG (typ IV); Jiné
fr: Norme d’homologation de la bouée de sauvetage: ISO 12402-4; MED (Directive sur les équipements marins); Non spécifié; Approuvé SOLAS/OMI; Approuvé par Transports Canada; Approuvé par l’USCG (type IV); Autre
sv: Godkännandestandard för livboj: ISO 12402-4; MED (Marine Equipment Directive); Ej angivet; SOLAS-/IMO-godkänd; Godkänd av Transport Canada; USCG-godkänd (typ IV); Övrigt
pt-BR: Boia salva-vidas aprovação norma: ISO 12402-4; MED (Diretiva de Equipamentos Marítimos); Não especificado; Aprovado pela SOLAS/IMO; Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela USCG (Tipo IV); Outro
vi: Tiêu chuẩn phê duyệt phao cứu sinh: ISO 12402-4; MED (Chỉ thị về thiết bị hàng hải); Không chỉ định; Chứng nhận SOLAS/IMO; Chứng nhận Transport Canada; Chứng nhận USCG (Loại IV); Khác
sk-SK: Schvaľovací štandard záchranného kolesa: ISO 12402-4; MED (smernica o námornom vybavení); Nešpecifikované; Schválené SOLAS/IMO; Schválené Transport Canada; Schválené USCG (typ IV); Iné
el: Πρότυπο έγκρισης σωσιβίου: ISO 12402-4; MED (Οδηγία για τον εξοπλισμό πλοίων); Δεν καθορίζεται; Εγκεκριμένο κατά SOLAS/IMO; Εγκεκριμένο από Transport Canada; Εγκεκριμένο από USCG (Τύπος IV); Άλλο